Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2167YH (2) 91 ss/ko H.F. 409 Section 1. Section 135B.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. The department shall also adopt 3 rules prohibiting hospitals and rural emergency hospitals 4 from including on an application for clinical privileges a 5 question regarding whether the applicant has a past history or 6 diagnosis of mental illness, substance use disorders, or other 7 physical or behavioral health conditions. The rules shall 8 allow hospitals and rural emergency hospitals to include on 9 an application for clinical privileges a question regarding 10 whether the applicant currently has any condition that is not 11 being appropriately treated which impairs or adversely affects 12 the applicantâs ability to practice with reasonable skill and 13 safety in a competent, ethical, and professional manner. 14 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 147.4A Applications ââ current 15 impairment. 16 A board shall not include on an application for licensure 17 or renewal of a license a question regarding whether the 18 applicant has a past history or diagnosis of mental illness, 19 substance use disorders, or other physical or behavioral 20 health conditions. A board may include on an application for 21 licensure or renewal of a license a question regarding whether 22 the applicant currently has any condition that is not being 23 appropriately treated which impairs or adversely affects the 24 applicantâs ability to practice with reasonable skill and 25 safety in a competent, ethical, and professional manner. 26